Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.064

Reimbursement of expenses for travel to and from division headquarters.

The court of appeals is authorized to adopt rules providing for the reimbursement of work-related travel expenses from a judge's customary residence to the division headquarters of the court and back. Judges elected from or residing in the county in which the division is headquartered are not eligible for reimbursement under this section. The rates of reimbursement are as set forth in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2007 c 34 s 2.]